Utah statutes.
62A-1-104.   Definitions.

(1)  As used in this title:

(a)  "Concurrence of the board" means agreement by a majority of the members of a board.

(b)  "Department" means the Department of Human Services established in Section 62A-1-102.

(c)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the department, appointed pursuant to Section 62A-1-108.

(2)  The definitions provided in Subsection (1) are to be applied in addition to definitions contained throughout this title which are applicable to specific chapters or parts.



Amended by Chapter 183, 1990 General Session

